Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.140

Public stadium authority board of directors—Compensation—Waiver.

Each member of the board of directors of the public stadium authority may receive compensation of fifty dollars per day for attending meetings or conferences on behalf of the authority, not to exceed three thousand dollars per year. A director may waive all or a portion of his or her compensation under this section as to a month or months during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the public stadium authority. The compensation provided in this section is in addition to reimbursement for expenses paid to the directors by the public stadium authority.

[ 1997 c 220 s 113 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]